Hawaii statutes.
[PART I.
SELECTION AND SERVICE]

Revision Note

Part heading added pursuant to §23G-15.

[§612-1] Declaration of policy. It is
the policy of this State that all persons selected for jury service be selected
at random from a fair cross section of the population of the area served by the
court, and that all qualified citizens have the opportunity in accordance with
this chapter to be considered for jury service in this State and an obligation
to serve as jurors when summoned for that purpose. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1]

Cross References

Right to trial by jury of the "district" conferred
by Const. art. I, §14. "District" means the judicial circuit,
§806-17.

Law Journals and Reviews

State v. Levinson: Limitations on a Criminal Defendant's Use
of Peremptory Challenges. 13 UH L. Rev. 279 (1991).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next